Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2601.01
Expenditure of funds; limitation.

The department shall not expend any funds under sections 39-2601 to 39-2612 unless federal-aid matching funds are available for the purpose described in 23 U.S.C. 136.

Laws 1995, LB 264, § 34.